Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.190

Family court jurisdiction as to pending actions—Use of family court services.

(1) The family court shall have jurisdiction and full power in all pending cases to make, alter, modify, and enforce all temporary and permanent orders regarding the following: Parenting plans, child support, custody of children, visitation, possession of property, maintenance, contempt, custodial interference, and orders for attorneys' fees, suit money or costs as may appear just and equitable. Court commissioners or judges shall not have authority to require the parties to mediate disputes concerning child support.

(2) Family court investigation, evaluation, mediation, treatment, and reconciliation services, and any other services may be used to assist the court to develop an order as the court deems necessary to preserve the marriage or the domestic partnership, implement an amicable settlement, and resolve the issues in controversy.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1025; 1991 c 367 s 14; 1983 c 219 s 7; 1949 c 50 s 19; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-48.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.